Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 1 Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals

40.1-1-1 — 40.1-1-3.
[Repealed.]

40.1-1-3.1.
New title for department.

Wherever in the general or public laws, or any rule or regulation, any reference to the “department of mental health, retardation and hospitals” or to “department” shall appear, it shall be deemed to mean and shall mean “the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.”

Wherever in the general or public laws, or any rule or regulation, there appears any reference to “mental retardation” or “retardation” as it relates to developmental disabilities, said reference shall be deemed to mean and shall mean “developmental disabilities,” and shall upon enactment of this section be referred to as “developmental disabilities.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 101, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 105, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 396, § 1.

40.1-1-4.
Organization of department.

All functions, services, and duties of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall be organized by the director with the approval of the governor as to:

Division of behavioral health care which includes the program areas of integrated mental health services and substance abuse treatment and prevention services;

Division of hospitals and community rehabilitation services to include the Zambarano unit, the Cranston unit, and the adult psychiatric services unit of the Eleanor Slater Hospital;

Division of developmental disabilities; and

Management services to include all management, financial, and other services necessary to ensure the proper operation of the department.

History of Section.

Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1977, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 332, § 1.

40.1-1-5.
Reorganizations within department.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any division, bureau, or other unit or agency within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, however entitled or described, may at any time be reorganized, divided, consolidated, abolished, or otherwise reconstituted by the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, with the approval of the governor, as may be desirable for the proper administration and performance of the powers, functions, and duties assigned to the department and any such change shall conform with the requirements of §

40.1-1-4

.

History of Section.

Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1977, ch. 142, § 1.

40.1-1-6.
Offices of department.

The department of administration shall furnish the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals offices in which to transact its business and keep its records. Those offices shall be open for business each day of the year except Sundays and legal holidays during hours as may be prescribed by the director.

History of Section.

Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1977, ch. 142, § 1.

40.1-1-7.
Appointment of employees.

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, subject to the provisions of chapter 4 of title 36, shall be the appointing authority for all employees of the department, and the director may assign this function to subordinate officers and employees as may to him or her seem feasible or desirable.

History of Section.

Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1977, ch. 142, § 1.

40.1-1-8.
Federal funds for planning, advocacy, monitoring, evaluation, review, and comment of all state plans regarding individuals with developmental disabilities.

The state council on developmental disabilities is hereby designated to be the sole agency of the state to develop and, as approved by the governor, establish a plan for improving services for individuals with developmental disabilities and administer any statewide plan for the provision of care, treatment, diagnosis, rehabilitation, training, or related services, which plan is now or may hereafter be required as a condition to the eligibility for benefits pursuant to the provisions of the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act, 42 U.S.C. § 6000 et seq. [repealed], as enacted by Title V of Pub. L. No. 95-602 on November 6, 1978, by the Congress of the United States, and subsequent amendments thereto. The state council on developmental disabilities is also authorized to receive, administer, and expend any funds that may be available under this federal act, or from any other sources public or private, for those purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 492, § 1.

40.1-1-8.1.
“Developmental disability” defined.

The term “developmental disability” means a severe, chronic disability of a person that:

Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental and physical impairments;

Is manifested before the person attains age twenty-two (22);

Is likely to continue indefinitely;

Results in substantial functional limitations in three (3) or more of the following areas of major life activity:

Self-care;

Receptive and expressive language;

Learning;

Mobility;

Self-direction;

Capacity for independent living; and

Economic self-sufficiency; and

Reflects the person’s need for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, or other services that are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 94, § 1.

40.1-1-9.
State council on developmental disabilities.

The governor shall establish a state council administratively attached to the university of Rhode Island (hereafter referred to as the “university”) and make appropriate provisions for the rotation of membership, and appoint such representatives as are required as a condition of eligibility for benefits under the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, Pub. L. No. 106-402, codified at 42 U.S.C. § 15001 et seq., to consult with the directors of the state departments of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, human services, children, youth and families, health, and elementary and secondary education in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

The council shall review and, where appropriate, make findings and recommendations on programs related to the care provided to persons with developmental disabilities including, but not limited to, other services available to them. The council should continue to strive to see that individuals with developmental disabilities receive the substantial care and assistance that can be provided to them and shall continue to monitor, plan, and evaluate, as may be appropriate, those services and supports affording protections to persons with developmental disabilities.

The council shall submit to the United States Department of Health and Human Services amendments to its state plan, in compliance with the public notice and other requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 15024 and 45 C.F.R. § 1386.30 and 1386.31, that provide for the council’s incorporation as a nonprofit corporation and for the designation of the university of Rhode Island as the state agency that shall, on behalf of the state, provide support to the council. After approval of the amendments, the council shall incorporate as a nonprofit corporation and enter into a memorandum of understanding with the university delineating the roles and responsibilities of the university. Thereafter, the governor shall designate the university as the state agency responsible for providing support services to the council pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 15025(d) and 45 C.F.R. § 1386.34.

The university shall have the fiscal and other responsibilities of a designated state agency pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 15025(d) and 45 C.F.R. § 1386.34. As required by 42 U.S.C. § 15024(c)(5)(L), the university and any other agency, office or entity of the state, shall not interfere with the advocacy, capacity building, systemic change activities, budget, personnel, state plan development, or plan implementation of the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 226, § 18; P.L. 1981, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 414, § 16; P.L. 1989, ch. 492, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 1.

40.1-1-10.
Parent deinstitutionalization subsidy aid program.

There is hereby established within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals a deinstitutionalization subsidy aid program. The program is founded for the express purpose of providing financial assistance or subsidy aid to the qualified parent applicant, or if the parent is not able to care for the person then an appropriate relative as defined in this chapter, who is found and certified to be qualified by the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals to receive and take into his or her care, custody, and control a person under the legal authority and control of the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals who is and has been a resident or patient of the Dr. Joseph H. Ladd Center, the Dr. U.E. Zambarano Memorial Hospital, at the institute of mental health or the general hospital, or a resident in an out-of-state institution, who would have been eligible for placement in the Dr. Joseph H. Ladd Center, Dr. U.E. Zambarano Memorial Hospital or the institute of mental health or the general hospital for a period of time not less than ninety (90) days, or would be a resident or patient of one of the facilities listed in this section for a period of ninety (90) days or more if a specialized community program were not developed to meet the person’s particular and/or unique needs and meets the eligibility criteria contained in §

40.1-21-4.3

.

The general assembly hereby finds that such a parent deinstitutionalization program would promote the general welfare of the citizens of the state and further the purpose of providing deinstitutionalization care, treatment, and training for the institutionalized person and subsidy aid to the qualified parent applicant or an appropriate relative of the institutionalized person. It is further found that the program is established for the purpose of providing subsidy aid to assist and make available non-institutional care, support, and training when it is found to be in the best interests of the health and welfare of the institutionalized person and where that placement may be made and certified by the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals to the qualified parent applicant.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals is hereby vested with the authority to promulgate rules and regulations as are deemed necessary and in the public interest to establish and place into operation the parent deinstitutionalization program and authorize the payment of subsidy aid to the qualified parent applicant or an appropriate relative who receives into his or her care, custody, and control a person under the legal authority and control of the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals who is or has been a resident or patient of the Dr. Joseph H. Ladd Center, the Dr. U.E. Zambarano Memorial Hospital, at the institute of mental health or the general hospital or a resident or patient in an out-of-state institution who would have been eligible for placement in the Dr. Joseph H. Ladd Center, Dr. U.E. Zambarano Memorial Hospital, or the institute of mental health, or the general hospital.

Rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (c) shall include, but not be limited to, the following areas of concern:

The establishment of eligibility and other requirements for the qualification and certification of the parent applicant applying for subsidy aid under this chapter;

The establishment of eligibility and other requirements for the qualification and certification of a person to be removed and placed from the Dr. Joseph H. Ladd Center or Dr. U.E. Zambarano Memorial Hospital, or the institute of mental health or the general hospital, under this program as set forth in this chapter or a resident or patient in an out-of-state institution under this program as set forth in this chapter;

The establishment of such other eligibility, certification, and qualification standards and guidelines for the person or the parent applicant or an appropriate relative to which the program applies as may be deemed reasonable and in the public interest;

The establishment of such licensing, regulating, inspection, monitoring, investigation, and evaluation standards and requirements for the placement, care, support, custody, and training of the person as are deemed reasonable and in the public interest under this chapter;

The periodic inspection, review, and evaluation of the care, support, and treatment afforded the person placed in the home of the qualified parent applicant or an appropriate relative under this program and the making and implementation of such recommendations as are deemed necessary for the continued health, safety, and welfare of the person in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

The establishment and implementation of such other standards, safeguards, and protections as are deemed necessary and in the public interest to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the person placed under the program or in determining and certifying initial and/or continuing eligibility requirements as the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall in his or her discretion deem to be necessary and appropriate, including, specifically, the authority to recall and return the child or adult to the custody and control of the state and the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals into any care or placement program as the director may in his or her discretion order and direct, including therein summary removal from the custody of the qualified parent applicant or an appropriate relative and return to the state institution or out-of-state institution.

For the purpose of this chapter the words “qualified parent applicant” shall mean any natural parent, adoptive parent, or foster parent or both natural parents jointly, both adoptive parents jointly, or a court-appointed guardian or both foster parents jointly, or as defined by rules or regulations established by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals who may apply for inclusion in the behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals deinstitutionalization subsidy aid program as set forth in this chapter. For the situation where the natural or adoptive parents are divorced or separated, or where one of the parents is deceased, the words “parent” or “parent applicant” shall mean the parent legally having or giving custody to the person who may apply for inclusion in behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals deinstitutionalization subsidy aid program as set forth in this chapter.

For the purpose of this chapter, the words “appropriate relative” shall mean an interested and approved relative of the adult.

For the purpose of this chapter the words “subsidy aid” shall mean payment or continued payment to a parent applicant pursuant to the rules and regulations established by the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals for deinstitutionalization subsidy aid program as set forth in this chapter.

Alternatives to institutional care. The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals is hereby directed to develop options, fiscal impact analysis, and recommendations for the expansion of shared living services to siblings of individuals with developmental disabilities who are no longer able to be cared for at home by aging parents. The department shall submit these recommendations to the governor, and to the general assembly by December 31, 2013.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 257, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 134; P.L. 2013, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 37.

40.1-1-10.1.
Subsidy aid for parent deinstitutionalization program.

Every qualified parent applicant or an appropriate relative of a person at the Dr. Joseph H. Ladd Center, Dr. U.E. Zambarano Memorial Hospital, the institute of mental health, or the general hospital (RIMC) or at an out-of-state institution who would have been eligible for placement in the Dr. Joseph H. Ladd Center, Dr. U.E. Zambarano Memorial Hospital, the institute of mental health, or the general hospital (RIMC), found eligible and certified as such by the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to this chapter and the rules and regulations established thereunder, shall be eligible to receive subsidy aid within the bounds set forth in this chapter and pursuant to the rules and regulations as are promulgated by the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and under the eligibility, income, health, safety, and other program requirements as may be deemed appropriate and necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the child or adult and the interest of the state in the maintenance and operation of the deinstitutionalization program.

A qualified parent applicant or an appropriate relative who is the natural or adoptive parent and certified as eligible for subsidy aid under the deinstitutionalization program shall receive an amount of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and not more than sixty dollars ($60.00) for the basic care of each child or adult for a seven-day (7) or weekly period, and an amount of not less than five dollars ($5.00) and not more than fifteen dollars ($15.00) for the training of each child or adult for the same period.

A qualified parent applicant who is a foster parent or an appropriate relative and certified as eligible for subsidy aid under the deinstitutionalization program shall receive an amount of not less than five dollars ($5.00) and not more than fifteen dollars ($15.00) for training of each child or adult and an amount of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and not more than sixty dollars ($60.00) for basic care and treatment for a seven-day (7) or weekly period. These amounts designated for foster parents shall be in addition to the basic payments to foster parents from the department of social and rehabilitative services for foster home placement.

The subsidy payments as provided by this section shall be paid from institutional or special accounts as may be under the control and direction of the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and earmarked for the placement and continuing support of an institutionalized person with a qualified parent or an appropriate relative application as set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 257, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 233, § 1.

40.1-1-11.
Housing for traumatically brain injured persons.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall have full authority and jurisdiction over the construction and staffing of group homes for traumatically brain injured persons; provided, however, the department shall consult with the Rhode Island chapter of the National Head Injury Foundation regarding the construction and staffing of group homes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 183, § 2.

40.1-1-12.
Permanent legislative oversight commission.

There is hereby created a permanent legislative commission entitled “permanent legislative oversight commission on substance abuse treatment” the purpose of which shall be to oversee the implementation and administration of all money and programs in substance-abuse treatment in the state and to report to the general assembly with advice and recommendations as to the adequacy, efficacy, and efficiency of all statutes, rules, regulations, guidelines, practices, and programs relating to substance abuse treatment and such other related matters as it deems appropriate.

The commission shall consist of ten (10) members; five (5) members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives from among the members of the house of representatives, not more than four (4) of whom shall be from the same political party; three (3) members shall be appointed by the president of the senate from among the members of the senate, not more than two (2) of whom shall be from the same political party; and one member (ex officio) shall be the director of MHRH, or his or her designee; and one member shall be the director of the department of health in the executive department, or his or her designee. The chairperson of the commission shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, except that they shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under this section.

The commission may request and shall receive from any instrumentality of the state, including the division of substance abuse of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the department of health in the executive department, department of children, youth and families, department of human services and other departments as the commission sees fit and from any municipality or any instrumentality thereof, information and assistance as it deems necessary for the proper execution of its powers and duties under this section.

The commission shall meet at least quarterly and shall report at least annually to the general assembly on its findings and recommendations with respect to:

All existing substance abuse treatment programs; and

Any matters relating to substance abuse treatment efforts in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 322, § 7; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 7; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 88; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 27.

40.1-1-13.
Powers and duties of the office.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Rhode Island general laws to the contrary, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall have the following powers and duties:

To establish and promulgate the overall plans, policies, objectives, and priorities for state substance abuse education, prevention, and treatment; provided, however, that the director shall obtain and consider input from all interested state departments and agencies prior to the promulgation of any such plans or policies;

Evaluate and monitor all state grants and contracts to local substance abuse service providers;

Develop, provide for, and coordinate the implementation of a comprehensive state plan for substance abuse education, prevention, and treatment;

Ensure the collection, analysis, and dissemination of information for planning and evaluation of substance abuse services;

Provide support, guidance, and technical assistance to individuals, local governments, community service providers, public and private organizations in their substance abuse education, prevention, and treatment activities;

Confer with all interested department directors to coordinate the administration of state programs and policies that directly affect substance abuse treatment and prevention;

Seek and receive funds from the federal government and private sources in order to further the purposes of this chapter;

To act in conjunction with the executive office of health and human services as the state’s co-designated agency (42 U.S.C. § 300x-30(a)) for administering federal aid and for the purposes of the calculation of the expenditures relative to the substance abuse block grant and federal funding maintenance of effort. The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, as the state’s substance abuse authority, will have the sole responsibility for the planning, policy and implementation efforts as it relates to the requirements set forth in pertinent substance abuse laws and regulations including 42 U.S.C. § 300x-21 et seq.;

Propose, review, and/or approve, as appropriate, proposals, policies, or plans involving insurance and managed care systems for substance abuse services in Rhode Island;

To enter into, in compliance with the provisions of chapter 2 of title 37, contractual relationships and memoranda of agreement as necessary for the purposes of this chapter;

To license facilities and programs for the care and treatment of substance abusers and for the prevention of substance abuse, and provide the list of licensed chemical dependency professionals (LCDP) and licensed chemical dependency clinical supervisors (LCDCS) (licensed by the department of health pursuant to chapter 69 of title 5) for use by state agencies including, but not limited to, the adjudication office of the department of transportation, the district court and superior court and the division of probation and parole for referral of individuals requiring substance use disorder treatment;

To promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the requirements of this chapter;

Perform other acts and exercise any other powers necessary or convenient to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter;

To exercise the authority and responsibilities relating to education, prevention, and treatment of substance abuse, as contained in, but not limited to, the following chapters: chapters 1.10, 10.1, and 28.2 of title 23; chapters 21.2 and 21.3 of title 16; chapter 50.1 of title 42 [repealed]; chapter 109 of title 42; chapter 69 of title 5; and §

35-4-18

;

To establish a Medicare Part D restricted-receipt account in the hospitals and community rehabilitation services program to receive and expend Medicare Part D reimbursements from pharmacy benefit providers consistent with the purposes of this chapter;

To establish a RICLAS group home operations restricted-receipt account in the services for the developmentally disabled program to receive and expend rental income from RICLAS group clients for group home-related expenditures, including food, utilities, community activities, and the maintenance of group homes;

To establish a non-Medicaid, third-party payor restricted-receipt account in the hospitals and community rehabilitation services program to receive and expend reimbursement from non-Medicaid, third-party payors to fund hospital patient services that are not Medicaid eligible; and

To certify recovery housing facilities directly, or through a contracted entity, as defined by department guidelines, which includes adherence to using National Alliance for Recovery Residences (NARR) standards. In accordance with a schedule to be determined by the department, all referrals from state agencies or state-funded facilities shall be to certified houses, and only certified recovery housing facilities shall be eligible to receive state funding to deliver recovery housing services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 257, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 458, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 10, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 8, § 8; P.L. 2016, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 21; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 9, § 6; P.L. 2018, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 205, § 1.

40.1-1-14.
Transfer determination.

The director of administration, with the approval of the governor, shall make the conclusive determination of the number of positions, personnel, property, records, and appropriation balances, allocations, and other funds of the department of health to be transferred to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals in connection with the functions transferred thereunto by the provisions of this chapter.

Such further measures and dispositions as the director of administration, with the approval of the governor, shall deem necessary in order to effectuate the transfer of functions provided in this chapter shall be carried out as the director of administration shall direct and by the agencies the director of administration shall designate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 257, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 458, § 4.

40.1-1-15.
Continuity of administrative function.

In order to ensure continuity of the administrative business of the state, the actual transfer of functions or any part thereof to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals from the department of health may be postponed after July 1, 1998, until such time as, by executive order of the governor, the transfer herein provided can be put into force and effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 257, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 458, § 4.

40.1-1-16.
Division of substance abuse services — Establishment.

The director of the department of administration shall promulgate rules and regulations that are necessary to establish a division of substance abuse services within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 257, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 458, § 4.

40.1-1-17.
Law revision.

All general and public laws affected by this chapter shall be revised, amended, consolidated, or conformed by the law revision office. Wherever in general and public laws reference is made to the functions of the department of health that are transferred to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the law revision director shall proceed according to the provisions set out in §

22-11-3.4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 257, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 458, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 354, § 23.

40.1-1-18.
Liberal construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed in aid of its declared purposes, the primary purpose of which is the coordination and integration of functions relating to substance abuse education, prevention, and treatment within one department and the allocation of these functions to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 257, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 458, § 4.

40.1-1-19.
Problem gambling — Program.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, division of substance abuse, in conjunction with the Rhode Island Council on Problem Gambling and the Drug and Alcohol Treatment Association of Rhode Island, shall develop a program to address problem gambling with the following components:

Treatment services. The division of substance abuse shall designate, through a request for proposals process, comprehensive treatment services for problem gamblers and their family members; provided, however, the cost of the treatment services program does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). The division shall present the recommended language for the request for proposals to the governor and the general assembly not later than December 31, 2000;

Prevention education. The Rhode Island Council on Problem Gambling shall develop a problem gaming prevention program; provided, however, the cost of the program does not exceed seven thousand dollars ($7,000). The council shall present the recommended program to the governor and the general assembly not later than December 31, 2000;

Training. The Drug and Alcohol Treatment Association of Rhode Island shall develop a training program to address problem gambling; provided, however, the cost of the program does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The association shall present the recommended program to the governor and the general assembly not later than December 31, 2000;

Prevalence study. The division of substance abuse shall designate, through a request for proposals process, a prevalence study; provided, however, the cost of the study does not exceed eight thousand dollars ($8,000). The division shall present the recommended language for the request for proposals to the governor and the general assembly not later than December 31, 2000.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 22, § 3.

40.1-1-20.
Problem gambling programs.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall establish and promulgate minimum standards for treatment programs for problem gamblers and for gaming prevention programs, and shall make these standards available to the public and to any organization that intends to provide such treatment or education programs.

The standards for treatment programs shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

Assessment criteria and procedures;

Admission and discharge criteria;

Client record keeping;

Staff training requirements;

Requirements for performance and outcome measures.

The department shall monitor and review treatment programs for problem gamblers and gaming prevention programs and shall certify programs that comply with the standards developed by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 152, § 1.

40.1-1-21.
Restricted receipts.

There is hereby created a restricted receipt account within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals for the purposes of receiving and expending monies from any other sources, public or private, limited to gifts, grants, and donations. The department shall deposit any revenues into the restricted receipt account to be used for the same purposes that its state appropriation is used, unless otherwise limited by agreement of such funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 2, § 7, effective July 6, 2021.